Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0623

Resignation and removal of officers.

(1) The board of directors may remove an officer at any time with or without cause.

(2) An officer of a limited cooperative association may resign at any time by giving notice in a record to the association. Unless the notice specifies a later time, the resignation is effective when the notice is given.

[ 2019 c 37 s 623.]